New York, session 2025-2026, S4152.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 168-a of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 542 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The following days shall be days of commemoration in each year: 5 January sixth, to be known as "Haym Salomon Day", January twenty-sev- 6 enth, to be known as "Holocaust Remembrance Day", February fourth, to be 7 known as "Rosa Parks Day", February fifteenth, to be known as "Susan B. 8 Anthony Day", February sixteenth, to be known as "Lithuanian Independ- 9 ence Day", February twenty-eighth, to be known as "Gulf War Veterans' 10 Day", March fourth, to be known as "Pulaski Day", March eighth, to be 11 known as "International Women's Day", March tenth, to be known as 12 "Harriet Tubman Day", March twenty-ninth, to be known as "Vietnam Veter- 13 ans' Day", April ninth, to be known as "POW Recognition Day", April 14 twenty-seventh, to be known as "Coretta Scott King Day", April twenty- 15 eighth, to be known as "Workers' Memorial Day", the first Tuesday in May 16 to be known as "New York State Teacher Day", May seventeenth, to be 17 known as "Thurgood Marshall Day", the first Sunday in June, to be known 18 as "Children's Day", June second, to be known as "Italian Independence 19 Day", June twelfth, to be known as "Women Veterans Recognition Day", 20 June nineteenth, to be known as "Juneteenth Freedom Day", June twenty- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07654-03-5 S. 4152--A 2 1 fifth, to be known as "Korean War Veterans' Day", the second Monday in 2 July, to be known as "Abolition Commemoration Day", August twenty- 3 fourth, to be known as "Ukrainian Independence Day", August twenty- 4 sixth, to be known as "Women's Equality Day", September eleventh, to be 5 known as "Battle of Plattsburgh Day" and also to be known as "September 6 11th Remembrance Day", September thirteenth, to be known as "John Barry 7 Day" and also to be known as "Uncle Sam Day in the State of New York", 8 September seventeenth, to be known as "Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben 9 Memorial Day", September twenty-second, to be known as "Veteran Suicide 10 Awareness and Remembrance Day", the third Friday in September to be 11 known as "New York State POW/MIA Recognition Day" except if such date of 12 commemoration cannot be observed due to a religious holiday, such obser- 13 vances shall then be conducted on the second Friday of September, the 14 last Saturday in September, to be known as "War of 1812 Day", the fourth 15 Saturday of September, known as "Native-American Day", the last Sunday 16 in September, to be known as "Gold Star Mothers' Day", October fifth, to 17 be known as "Raoul Wallenberg Day", October eleventh, to be known as 18 "New Netherland Day in the State of New York", October eighteenth, to be 19 known as "Disabilities History Day", October twenty-seventh, to be known 20 as "Theodore Roosevelt Day", November ninth, to be known as "Witness for 21 Tolerance Day", November twelfth, to be known as "Elizabeth Cady Stanton 22 Day", the third Tuesday in November to be known as "New York State 23 School-Related Professionals Recognition Day", November twenty-sixth, to 24 be known as "Sojourner Truth Day", November thirtieth, to be known as 25 "Shirley Chisholm Day", December third, to be known as "International 26 Day of Persons with Disabilities", December seventh, to be known as 27 "Pearl Harbor Day", December sixteenth, to be known as "Bastogne Day" 28 and that day of the Asian lunar calendar designated as new year to be 29 known as "Asian New Year". 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.